North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-18 Record for Review [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure]

28-18-01.
Exception defined. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 51; N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 46.

28-18-02.
What deemed excepted to. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 46.

28-18-03.
Exceptions on trial by referee — Service of findings and conclusions. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 46.

28-18-04.
Transcript — How prepared. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rule 10.

28-18-05.
Transcripts — Time of preparation and deposit. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rule 10.

28-18-06.
Statement of the case. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rules 50, 59; N.D.R.App.P., Rules 10, 28.

28-18-07.
Application to supreme court when judge refuses to settle. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rule 10.

28-18-08.
Statement of case — Vacancy of judgeship. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.App.P., Rule 10.

28-18-09.
Specifications of errors and insufficiency of the evidence. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 59; N.D.R.App.P. Rules 3, 28.